Hawaii, session 2025, SB753.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302A-1704, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  [The] Notwithstanding the limitations of section 78‑4, the board shall consist of five voting members[.  The members shall: (1)  Be appointed by the governor pursuant to section 26‑34; (2)  Have an interest in public school facilities; (3)  Include one member actively or previously engaged in the construction industry for at least five years; and (4)  Serve] as follows: (1)  The superintendent; (2)  Two members appointed by the governor; provided that one member shall have high-level planning experience and one member shall have at least five years of high‑level county permitting experience; (3)  One member appointed by the president of the senate; provided that the member shall have high-level construction experience and experience in government contracts; and (4)  One member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; provided that the member shall have at least five years of high-level construction experience. Each appointed member shall have demonstrated sufficient business or professional experience to discharge the functions of the board.  Except as provided in this section, the board members shall be subject to the requirements of section 26-34.  The members of the board shall devote time to their duties as may be necessary for the proper discharge thereof.  The members described in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________